New York, session 2025-2026, S113.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 131-a of the social services law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 6 to read as follows: 3 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a social services offi- 4 cial shall, in accordance with the provisions of this section, provide 5 public assistance to persons and families who receive temporary housing 6 assistance and three meals per day, or who reside in a shelter for 7 adults that provides three meals per day, or who reside in a shelter for 8 families that provides three meals per day, or who reside in a public 9 home that provides three meals per day, and are determined to be eligi- 10 ble by the application of the standard of need prescribed by the 11 provisions of subdivision two of this section, less any available income 12 or resources which are not required to be disregarded by other 13 provisions of this chapter, in accordance with the following schedule: 14 Number of Persons in Household 15 One Two Three Four Five Six 16 $366.20 $583.00 $778.00 $1003.40 $1237.40 $1428.40 17 For each additional eligible needy person in the household there shall 18 be an additional allowance of $195.00 monthly. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of April next succeeding 20 the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00634-01-5